Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this act. The appropriations are from the outdoor heritage fund for the fiscal year indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this act mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. The appropriations in this act are onetime appropriations. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin OUTDOOR HERITAGE FUNDnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 168,512,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 775,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is from the outdoor heritage fund. The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prairies new text end new text begin 34,199,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Martin County DNR WMA Acquisition, Phase 9 new text end new text begin $1,363,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and restore and enhance strategic prairie grassland, wetland, and other wildlife habitat in Martin County for wildlife management area purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8, as follows: $1,001,000 to Fox Lake Conservation League, Inc., $327,000 to Ducks Unlimited, and $35,000 to the Conservation Fund. new text end new text begin (b) Prairie Chicken Habitat Partnership of the Southern Red River Valley, Phase 11 new text end new text begin $3,690,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Pheasants Forever, in cooperation with the Minnesota Prairie Chicken Society, to acquire land in fee and restore and enhance lands in the southern Red River Valley for wildlife management purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8, or to be designated and managed as waterfowl production areas in Minnesota, in cooperation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquisitions of lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. new text end new text begin (c) RIM Grasslands Reserve, Phase 6 new text end new text begin $3,452,000 the first year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance grassland habitat under Minnesota Statutes, sections 103F.501 to 103F.531. Of this amount, up to $70,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (d) RIM Buffers for Wildlife and Water, Phase 11 new text end new text begin $4,092,000 the first year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources to acquire permanent conservation easements and restore habitat under Minnesota Statutes, section 103F.515, to protect, restore, and enhance habitat by expanding the riparian buffer program under the clean water fund for additional wildlife benefits from buffers on private land. Of this amount, up to $60,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (e) Accelerating the Wildlife Management Area Program, Phase 17 new text end new text begin $4,974,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Pheasants Forever to acquire in fee and restore and enhance lands for wildlife management area purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquisition of lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. new text end new text begin (f) Minnesota Prairie Recovery Program, Phase 14 new text end new text begin $2,489,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with The Nature Conservancy to acquire land in fee and restore and enhance native prairie, grasslands, wetlands, and savanna. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquiring lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. Annual income statements and balance sheets for income and expenses from land acquired with this appropriation must be submitted to the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council no later than 180 days following the close of The Nature Conservancy's fiscal year. A list of proposed land acquisitions, restorations, and enhancements must be provided as part of the required accomplishment plan and must be consistent with the priorities identified in Minnesota Prairie Conservation Plan. new text end new text begin (g) Northern Tallgrass Prairie National Wildlife Refuge, Phase 15 new text end new text begin $3,742,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with The Nature Conservancy, in cooperation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, to acquire land in fee or permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance lands in the Northern Tallgrass Prairie Habitat Preservation Area in western Minnesota for addition to the Northern Tallgrass Prairie National Wildlife Refuge. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquiring lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. new text end new text begin (h) DNR Wildlife Management Area and Scientific and Natural Area Acquisition, Phase 17 new text end new text begin $1,960,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources to acquire in fee and restore and enhance lands for wildlife management purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8, and to acquire land in fee for scientific and natural area purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 5. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquisition of lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. new text end new text begin (i) Enhanced Public Land - Grasslands, Phase 8 new text end new text begin $3,519,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Pheasants Forever to enhance and restore grassland and wetland habitat on public lands in the forest prairie transition, metro urban, and prairie ecoregions of Minnesota. new text end new text begin (j) Accelerating the USFWS Habitat Conservation Easement Program, Phase 5 new text end new text begin $4,918,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to restore and enhance wetland and prairie habitat on habitat easements of the United States Fish and Wildlife Service as follows: $3,170,000 to Ducks Unlimited and $1,748,000 to Pheasants Forever. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Forests new text end new text begin 20,414,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Minnesota Forest Recovery Project, Phase 3 new text end new text begin $3,543,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with The Nature Conservancy in cooperation with the Department of Natural Resources and Minnesota Land Trust to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance degraded forests in Beltrami, Cass, Cook, Itasca, Lake, Koochiching, and St. Louis Counties. Of this amount, up to $84,000 is to the easement holder to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (b) Itasca County Memorial Forest Project new text end new text begin $2,782,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Itasca County to acquire priority forest habitat lands in fee as county forests. new text end new text begin (c) Hardwood Hills Habitat Conservation Program, Phase 2 new text end new text begin $1,844,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance forest habitats in the hardwood hills ecological section of west-central Minnesota as follows: $100,000 to St. John's University and $1,744,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Of the amount to Minnesota Land Trust, $196,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (d) Camp Ripley Sentinel Landscape Protection Program ACUB, Phase 13 new text end new text begin $2,233,000 the first year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources, in cooperation with the Morrison County Soil and Water Conservation District, to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance forest wildlife habitat within the boundaries of the Minnesota National Guard Camp Ripley Sentinel Landscape and Army Compatible Use Buffer. Of this amount, up to $110,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (e) Minnesota Forests for the Future, Phase 5 new text end new text begin $5,361,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources to acquire lands in conservation easements and to restore and enhance forests, wetlands, and shoreline habitat through working forest permanent conservation easements under the Minnesota forests for the future program according to Minnesota Statutes, section 84.66. A conservation easement acquired with money appropriated under this paragraph must comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 13. The accomplishment plan must include an easement monitoring and enforcement plan. Of this amount, up to $400,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (f) DNR Forest Habitat Enhancement, Phase 5 new text end new text begin $2,601,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources to restore and enhance forest wildlife habitats on public lands throughout Minnesota. new text end new text begin (g) Moose Habitat Collaborative - Northeast Minnesota Forest Habitat Enhancement, Phase 5 new text end new text begin $2,050,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Ruffed Grouse Society to restore and enhance public forest lands in the northern forest region for moose habitat purposes. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Wetlands new text end new text begin 29,695,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Wetland Habitat Protection and Restoration Program, Phase 10 new text end new text begin $2,918,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Minnesota Land Trust to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance prairie, wetland, and other habitats on permanently protected conservation easements in high-priority wetland habitat complexes in the prairie, forest/prairie transition, and forest ecoregions. Of this amount, up to $168,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (b) Shallow Lake and Wetland Protection and Restoration Program, Phase 14 new text end new text begin $5,803,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Ducks Unlimited to acquire land in fee for wildlife management purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8, or to be designated and managed as waterfowl production areas or national wildlife refuges in Minnesota, in cooperation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, and to restore and enhance prairie lands, wetlands, and land-buffering shallow lakes. new text end new text begin (c) RIM Wetlands - Restoring the Most Productive Habitat in Minnesota, Phase 14 new text end new text begin $4,389,000 the first year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore wetlands and native grassland habitat under Minnesota Statutes, section 103F.515. Of this amount, up to $70,000 is for establishing a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (d) Accelerating the Waterfowl Production Area Acquisition Program, Phase 17 new text end new text begin $5,238,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Pheasants Forever, in cooperation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, to acquire land in fee and to restore and enhance wetlands and grasslands to be designated and managed as waterfowl production areas in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (e) Nelson Slough - East Park Wildlife Management Area, Phase 2 new text end new text begin $1,578,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Middle-Snake-Tamarac Rivers Watershed District to restore and enhance wetland and upland wildlife habitat in Nelson Slough and the East Park Wildlife Management Area in Marshall County. new text end new text begin (f) Living Shallow Lakes and Wetlands Enhancement and Restoration Initiative, Phase 11 new text end new text begin $5,729,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Ducks Unlimited to restore and enhance shallow lakes and wetlands on public lands and wetlands under permanent conservation easement for wildlife management. new text end new text begin (g) Big Swamp North new text end new text begin $1,475,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Roseau River Watershed District to restore and enhance wetland, stream, and other related wildlife habitat on public lands in the Big Swamp area in Roseau County. new text end new text begin (h) DNR Accelerated Shallow Lakes and Wetland Enhancement, Phase 17 new text end new text begin $2,565,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources to enhance and restore shallow lakes and wetland habitat statewide. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Habitats new text end new text begin 82,150,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Cannon River Watershed Habitat Restoration and Protection Program, Phase 14 new text end new text begin $2,724,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat in the Cannon River Watershed as follows: $62,000 to Clean River Partners; $1,228,000 to Great River Greening; and $1,434,000 to the Trust for Public Land. new text end new text begin (b) Spring Road Conservation Project new text end new text begin $2,027,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Riley Purgatory Bluff Creek Watershed District to acquire priority wildlife habitat lands in fee in Hennepin County. new text end new text begin (c) Anoka Sand Plain Habitat Conservation, Phase 10 new text end new text begin $3,599,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat on public lands and easements in the Anoka Sand Plain ecoregion and intersecting minor watersheds as follows: $599,000 to Anoka Conservation District; $1,404,000 to Great River Greening; $300,000 to The Nature Conservancy; and $1,296,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $112,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (d) Integrating Habitat and Clean Water, Phase 3 new text end new text begin $2,753,000 the first year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources to acquire permanent conservation easements and restore and enhance wildlife habitat identified in One Watershed, One Plan for stacked benefit to wildlife and clean water. Of this amount, up to $80,000 is for establishing a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (e) St. Croix Watershed Habitat Protection and Restoration, Phase 6 new text end new text begin $3,257,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance natural habitat systems in the St. Croix River Watershed as follows: $1,236,000 to the Trust for Public Land; $121,000 to Wild Rivers Conservancy; and $1,900,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $168,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (f) Mississippi Headwaters Habitat Corridor Project, Phase 9 new text end new text begin $2,832,000 the first year is to acquire lands in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore wildlife habitat in the Mississippi headwaters. Of this amount: (1) $1,768,000 is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements as follows: $60,000 to the Mississippi Headwaters Board and $1,708,000 to the Trust for Public Land; and (2) $1,064,000 is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources, of which up to $50,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (g) Southeast Minnesota Protection and Restoration, Phase 13 new text end new text begin $2,387,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Minnesota Land Trust to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat on public lands and permanent conservation easements in southeast Minnesota. Of this amount, up to $140,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (h) Protecting Coldwater Fisheries on Minnesota's North Shore, Phase 3 new text end new text begin $2,237,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Minnesota Land Trust to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat in priority coldwater tributaries to Lake Superior. Of this amount, up to $196,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (i) Metro Big Rivers, Phase 15 new text end new text begin $6,949,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance natural habitat systems associated with the Mississippi, Minnesota, and St. Croix Rivers and their tributaries in the metropolitan area as follows: $1,000,000 to Minnesota Valley National Wildlife Refuge Trust, Inc.; $529,000 to Friends of the Mississippi River; $1,015,000 to Great River Greening; $2,185,000 to the Trust for Public Land; and $2,220,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $168,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (j) Minnesota River Watershed Habitat Conservation Program new text end new text begin $3,148,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance priority habitat in the Minnesota River watershed as follows: $1,395,000 to Great River Greening and $1,753,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $168,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (k) Shell Rock River Watershed Habitat Restoration Program, Phase 14 new text end new text begin $2,190,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Shell Rock River Watershed District to acquire land in fee and to restore and enhance habitat in the Shell Rock River watershed. new text end new text begin (l) Protecting Minnesota's Lakes of Outstanding Biological Significance, Phase 4 new text end new text begin $3,209,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance lakes of outstanding biological significance in northeast and north-central Minnesota. Of this amount, $1,530,000 is to the Northern Waters Land Trust and $1,679,000 is to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $168,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is for establishing a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (m) Shakopee Creek: Headwaters Restored, Species and Land Protected new text end new text begin $2,413,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Kandiyohi Soil and Water Conservation District to restore and enhance wildlife habitat in the headwaters area of Shakopee Creek in Kandiyohi County. new text end new text begin (n) DNR Trout Stream Conservation Easements, Phase 4 new text end new text begin $995,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources to acquire land in permanent conservation easements to protect trout-stream aquatic habitat. Of this amount, up to $120,000 is for establishing a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (o) Fisheries Habitat Protection on Strategic North-Central Minnesota Lakes, Phase 11 new text end new text begin $2,944,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat to sustain healthy fish habitat on coldwater lakes in Aitkin, Cass, Crow Wing, and Hubbard Counties as follows: $1,292,000 to Northern Waters Land Trust and $1,652,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $168,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (p) Minnesota Statewide Trout Habitat Enhancement, Phase 2 new text end new text begin $2,173,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Minnesota Trout Unlimited to restore and enhance habitat for trout and other species in and along coldwater rivers, lakes, and streams throughout Minnesota. new text end new text begin (q) Restoring and Enhancing Minnesota's Important Bird Areas, Phase 4 new text end new text begin $2,049,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Audubon Minnesota to restore and enhance wildlife habitat in important bird areas or Minnesota Prairie Conservation Plan Priority areas of northwestern Minnesota. new text end new text begin (r) Fall River Restoration new text end new text begin $1,348,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Cook County to restore and enhance coldwater stream habitat in the Fall River in Cook County. new text end new text begin (s) DNR Aquatic Habitat Restoration and Enhancement, Phase 8 new text end new text begin $3,887,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources to restore and enhance aquatic habitat in degraded streams and aquatic management areas and to facilitate fish passage throughout Minnesota. new text end new text begin (t) Rum River Corridor Fish and Wildlife Habitat Enhancement, Phase 3 new text end new text begin $1,387,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Anoka County Soil and Water Conservation District to restore and enhance upland and riverine habitat in the Rum River corridor. new text end new text begin (u) DNR Roving Crew, Phase 3 new text end new text begin $12,642,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources to restore and enhance fish and wildlife habitat on permanently protected lands throughout Minnesota using the roving crew program of the Department of Natural Resources. new text end new text begin (v) Conservation Partners Legacy Grant Program: Statewide and Metro Habitat, Phase 17 new text end new text begin $15,000,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for a program to provide competitive matching grants of up to $500,000 to local, regional, state, and national organizations for enhancing, restoring, or protecting forests, wetlands, prairies, or habitat for fish, game, or wildlife in Minnesota. Of this amount, unless not enough eligible grant applications are received, at least $4,000,000 is for grants in the seven-county metropolitan area and cities with a population of 50,000 or more and at least $4,000,000 is for grants to applicants that have not previously applied for money from the outdoor heritage fund. Grants must not be made for activities required to fulfill the duties of owners of lands subject to conservation easements. Grants must not be made from the appropriation in this paragraph for projects that have a total project cost exceeding $1,000,000. Of the total appropriation, $600,000 may be spent for personnel costs, outreach, and support to first-time applicants and other direct and necessary administrative costs. Grantees may acquire land or interests in land. Easements must be permanent. Grants may not be used to establish easement stewardship accounts. The program must require a match of at least ten percent from nonstate sources for all grants. The match may be cash or in-kind. For grant applications of $25,000 or less, the commissioner must provide a separate, simplified application process. Subject to Minnesota Statutes, the commissioner of natural resources must, when evaluating projects of equal value, give priority to organizations that have a history of receiving, or a charter to receive, private contributions for local conservation or habitat projects. All restoration or enhancement projects must be on land permanently protected by a permanent covenant ensuring perpetual maintenance and protection of restored and enhanced habitat, by a conservation easement, or by public ownership or in public waters as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 103G.005, subdivision 15. Priority must be given to restoration and enhancement projects on public lands. Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 13, applies to grants awarded under this paragraph. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. No less than five percent of the amount of each grant must be held back from reimbursement until the grant recipient completes a grant accomplishment report by the deadline and in the form prescribed by and satisfactory to the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council. The commissioner must provide notice of the grant program in the summary of game and fish law prepared under Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.051, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Administration new text end new text begin 2,054,000 new text end new text begin 775,000 new text end new text begin (a) Contract Management new text end new text begin $410,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for contract management duties assigned in this section. The commissioner must provide an accomplishment plan in the form specified by the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council on expending this appropriation. The accomplishment plan must include a copy of the grant contract template and reimbursement manual. No money may be expended before the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council approves the accomplishment plan. Money appropriated in this paragraph is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) Legislative Coordinating Commission new text end new text begin $732,000 the first year and $772,000 the second year are to the Legislative Coordinating Commission for administrative expenses of the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council and for compensating and reimbursing expenses of council members. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.281, applies to this appropriation. new text end new text begin (c) Technical Evaluation Panel new text end new text begin $168,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for a technical evaluation panel to conduct up to 20 restoration and enhancement evaluations under Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 10. Money appropriated in this paragraph is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (d) Core Functions in Partner-Led OHF Land Acquisitions new text end new text begin $740,000 the first year is to the commissioner of natural resources for administering the initial development, restoration, and enhancement of land acquired in fee with money appropriated from the outdoor heritage fund. This appropriation may be used for land acquisition costs incurred by the department as part of conveyance of parcels to the Department of Natural Resources and initial development activities on fee title acquisitions. Money appropriated in this paragraph is available until June 30, 2033. new text end new text begin (e) Legacy Website new text end new text begin $4,000 the first year and $3,000 the second year are to the Legislative Coordinating Commission for the website required under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.303, subdivision 10. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Availability of Appropriation new text end new text begin (a) Money appropriated in this section may not be spent on activities unless they are directly related to and necessary for a specific appropriation and are specified in the accomplishment plan approved by the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council. Money appropriated in this section must not be spent on indirect costs or other institutional overhead charges that are not directly related to and necessary for a specific appropriation. Money appropriated for fee title acquisition of land may be used to restore, enhance, and provide for public use of the land acquired with the appropriation. Public-use facilities must have a minimal impact on habitat in acquired lands. new text end new text begin (b) Money appropriated in this section is available as follows: new text end new text begin (1) money appropriated for acquiring real property is available until June 30, 2029; new text end new text begin (2) money appropriated for restoring and enhancing land acquired with an appropriation in this act is available for four years after the acquisition date with a maximum end date of June 30, 2033; new text end new text begin (3) money appropriated for restoring and enhancing other land is available until June 30, 2030; new text end new text begin (4) notwithstanding clauses (1) to (3), money appropriated for a project that receives at least 15 percent of its funding from federal funds is available until a date sufficient to match the availability of federal funding to a maximum of six years if the federal funding was confirmed and included in the original approved draft accomplishment plan; and new text end new text begin (5) money appropriated for other projects is available until the end of the fiscal year in which it is appropriated. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Payment Conditions and Capital Equipment Expenditures new text end new text begin (a) All agreements referred to in this section must be administered on a reimbursement basis unless otherwise provided in this section. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.41, expenditures directly related to each appropriation's purpose made on or after July 1, 2025, or the date of accomplishment plan approval, whichever is later, are eligible for reimbursement unless otherwise provided in this section. For the purposes of administering appropriations and legislatively authorized agreements paid out of the outdoor heritage fund, an expense must be considered reimbursable by the administering agency when the recipient presents the agency with an invoice or binding agreement with the landowner and the recipient attests that the goods have been received or the landowner agreement is binding. Periodic reimbursement must be made upon receiving documentation that the items articulated in the accomplishment plan approved by the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council have been achieved, including partial achievements as evidenced by progress reports approved by the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council. Reasonable amounts may be advanced to projects to accommodate cash flow needs, support future management of acquired lands, or match a federal share. The advances must be approved as part of the accomplishment plan. Capital equipment expenditures for specific items in excess of $10,000 must be itemized in and approved as part of the accomplishment plan. new text end new text begin (b) Unless otherwise provided, no money appropriated from the outdoor heritage fund in this act may be used to acquire, restore, or enhance any real property unless the specific acquisition, restoration, or enhancement is approved as part of the accomplishment plan on the parcel list. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Mapping new text end new text begin Each direct recipient of money appropriated in this section, as well as each recipient of a grant awarded under this section, must provide geographic information to the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council for mapping of any lands acquired in fee with funds appropriated in this section and open to the public taking of fish and game. The commissioner of natural resources must include the lands acquired in fee with money appropriated in this section on maps showing public recreation opportunities. Maps must include information on and acknowledgment of the outdoor heritage fund, including a notation of any restrictions. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Carryforward new text end new text begin (a) The availability of the appropriation for Laws 2020, chapter 104, article 1, section 2, subdivision 5, paragraph (b), Metro Big Rivers - Phase X, is extended to June 30, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) The availability of the appropriation for Laws 2020, chapter 104, article 1, section 2, subdivision 5, paragraph (k), St. Louis River Restoration Initiative - Phase VII, is extended to June 30, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) The availability of the appropriation for Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 1, section 2, subdivision 6, paragraph (d), Core Functions in Partner-Led OHF Land Acquisitions, is extended to June 30, 2031. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Cancellation new text end new text begin $120,000 of the outdoor heritage fund appropriation in Laws 2020, chapter 104, article 1, section 2, subdivision 2, paragraph (i), is canceled no later than June 29, 2025. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 11 is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.056, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 25. new text end new text begin Federal grant fund requirements. new text end new text begin An interest in real property acquired with money appropriated from the outdoor heritage fund may be used to leverage federal grant funds for related conservation programs, such as Pittman-Robertson Wildlife Restoration, United States Code, title 16, section 669 et seq.; Dingell-Johnson Sport Fish Restoration, United States Code, title 16, section 777 et seq.; and the North American Wetlands Conservation Act, United States Code, title 16, section 4401. These grant programs may place conditions on land use that require the continued use of the land for conservation purposes. Placement of conditions on land use under these programs does not require prior review and approval of the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council or its successor under subdivision 15, paragraph (b). new text end